Hawaii statutes.
[§607-1.5] Court interpreting services
revolving fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the court
interpreting services revolving fund, into which shall be deposited:

(1) Fees, charges, and other moneys collected for
programs relating to interpreter issues and training, screening, testing, and
certification of court interpreters;

(2) All moneys received from public or private
sources for the purposes of this fund; and

(3) Any interest accrued or investment earnings
realized that are attributable to the moneys in the revolving fund.

(b) Moneys in the court interpreting services
revolving fund shall be administered and expended by the administrative
director of the courts to support the court interpreting services program's
educational services and the program's activities relating to the training,
screening, testing, and certification of court interpreters. [L 2005, c 184,
§1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next